Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.090

Filings, registration, or finding of director—Construction.

(1) Neither (a) the fact that application for registration under this law has been filed nor (b) the fact that such registration has become effective constitutes a finding by the director that any document filed under this law is true, complete, or not misleading. Neither any such fact or the fact that an exemption is available for a transaction means that the director has passed in any way on the merit or qualifications of or recommended or given approval to any person, franchise, or transaction.

(2) It is unlawful to make or cause to be made to any prospective franchisee any representation inconsistent with this section.

[ 2012 c 121 s 7; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 9.]